District of Columbia statutes.
29-404.22

Purchase of memberships.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, a membership corporation that is not a charitable corporation shall not purchase any of its memberships or any right arising therefrom.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-404.40, § 29-404.41, and § 29-408.22.